Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.805

Programs that support science, technology, engineering, and mathematics programs or career and technical education programs—Selection of colleges—Development of courses leading to a high-demand applied baccalaureate degree.

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose and in addition to other applied baccalaureate degree programs and pursuant to the criteria in RCW 28B.50.810, the college board shall select community or technical colleges to develop and offer two programs that support the continuation of high quality science, technology, engineering, and mathematics programs or career and technical education programs offered to students in kindergarten through twelfth grade who are prepared and aspire to continue in these high-demand areas in college and the workforce. Subject to available funding, a college selected under this section may develop the curriculum for and design and deliver courses leading to a high-demand applied baccalaureate degree.

[ 2013 c 55 s 2.]